src/fst/stems/particles.lexc
LEXICON Particles
!!! Common
! Singular
 ang # ; ! Direct
 ng # ; ! Indirect
 sa # ; ! Oblique
! Plural
! ang mgá # ; ! Direct
! ng mgá # ; ! Indirect
! sa mgá # ; ! Oblique
 mga # ; ! Pluralizer

!!! Personal
! Singular
 si # ; ! Direct
 ni # ; ! Indirect
 kay # ; ! Oblique
! Singular
 sina # ; ! Direct
 nina # ; ! Indirect
 kina # ; ! Oblique
